Hawaii statutes.
Subpart 2. Duties and Operation of Filing
Office

§490:9-519 Numbering, maintaining, and
indexing records; communicating information provided in records. (a) For
each record filed in a filing office, the filing office shall:

(1) Assign a unique number to the filed record;

(2) Create a record that bears the number assigned to
the filed record and the date and time of filing;

(3) Maintain the filed record for public inspection;
and

(4) Index the filed record in accordance with
subsections (c), (d), and (e).

(b) A file number must include a digit that:

(1) Is mathematically derived from or related to the
other digits of the file number; and

(2) Aids the filing office in determining whether a
number communicated as the file number includes a single-digit or
transpositional error.

(c) Except as otherwise provided in
subsections (d) and (e), the filing office shall:

(1) Index an initial financing statement according to
the name of the debtor and index all filed records relating to the initial
financing statement in a manner that associates with one another an initial
financing statement and all filed records relating to the initial financing
statement; and

(2) Index a record that provides a name of a debtor
which was not previously provided in the financing statement to which the
record relates also according to the name that was not previously provided.

(d) If a financing statement is filed as a
fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the
filing office shall index it:

(1) Under the names of the debtor and of each owner
of record shown on the financing statement as if they were the mortgagors under
a mortgage of the real property described; and

(2) To the extent that the law of this State provides
for indexing of records of mortgages under the name of the mortgagee, under the
name of the secured party as if the secured party were the mortgagee
thereunder, or, if indexing is by description, as if the financing statement
were a record of a mortgage of the real property described.

(e) If a financing statement is filed as a
fixture filing or covers as-extracted collateral or timber to be cut, the
filing office shall index an assignment filed under section 490:9-514(a) or an
amendment filed under section 490:9-514(b):

(1) Under the name of the assignor as grantor; and

(2) To the extent that the law of this State provides
for indexing a record of the assignment of a mortgage under the name of the
assignee, under the name of the assignee.

(f) The filing office shall maintain a
capability:

(1) To retrieve a record by the name of the debtor
and by the file number assigned to the initial financing statement to which the
record relates; and

(2) To associate and retrieve with one another an
initial financing statement and each filed record relating to the initial
financing statement.

(g) The filing office may not remove a
debtor's name from the index until one year after the effectiveness of a
financing statement naming the debtor lapses under section 490:9-515 with
respect to all secured parties of record.

(h) The filing office shall perform the acts
required by subsections (a) through (e) at the time and in the manner
prescribed by filing-office rule, but not later than two business days after
the filing office receives the record in question. [L 2000, c 241, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next